Hawaii statutes.
§571-31.5 Informal adjustment, status
offenders. (a) When a child reasonably believed to come within section
571-11(2) is referred to the court or other designated agency, informal
adjustment shall be provided to the child by an intake officer duly authorized
by the family court only where the facts reasonably appear to establish prima
facie jurisdiction and are admitted and where a consent is obtained from the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and the child, if of sufficient
age and understanding. Informal adjustment under this section may include,
among other suitable methods, programs, and procedures, listed in section
571-31.4(c), except section 571‑31.4(c)(1), and provided that placement
with shelter facilities under section 571-31.4(c)(9) shall be on a nonsecure
basis unless the child is processed under subsection (b).

(b) In the event resources and services for
informal adjustment are not available, have failed, are reasonably believed to
fail if attempted, or are unable to respond to the needs of the child or
family, the intake officer shall proceed with formal action, or take such
action as is otherwise allowed under this chapter. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §5(3);
am L 1988, c 294, §6; am L 2014, c 201, §11]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to delinquent behavior committed
on or after July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21.

Rules of Court

Informal adjustment, see HFCR rule 124.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next